Oklahoma, session 2025, SB851.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 509.11, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 509.11. A. No school district, employee of a school


district, or employee organization shall deny by any means,


including a collective bargaining agreement, a statewide


professional educators’ association equal access to employees of the

Req. No. 408 Page 1


school district, to the same extent that access is granted to other


educators’ associations. For purposes of this section, access shall


include, but is not limited to:


1. Setting up informational tables at in-service or other


similar teacher meetings;


2. Speaking at in-service or other similar teacher meetings;


3. Distributing information in school mail boxes or through the


school e-mail system;


4. Utilizing school district meeting rooms during nonworking


hours;


5. Representing employees in employment matters, when requested


by the employee;


6. Posting information on school district bulletin boards or


other common space displays; and


7. Utilizing school district printing services Promotional


events.


B. Any association which utilizes school district facilities or


services shall reimburse the district for any costs incurred by the


district due to association activities.


C. Equal access shall not be conditional on provisions or


services requested by school districts including, but not limited


to, furnished meals, snacks, gifts, donations, or other types of


sponsored activities.



Req. No. 408 Page 2


D. Communication by an employee, volunteer, or member of a


statewide professional educators’ association on behalf of the


association or a local affiliate group that pertains to a collective


bargaining agreement or negotiated employment contract pursuant to


Section 509.2 of this title shall, for the purposes of this section,


be classified as a promotional event hosted by the statewide


association, and all other statewide professional educators’


associations and their employees shall be granted equal access to


communicate with school employees to the same extent. For the


purposes of this section, communication includes, but is not limited


to, presentations, speaking events, meetings, emails, informational


displays, and virtual forum posts.


E. Distribution of promotional materials to all employees in


school mailboxes by employees or associated members of a statewide


professional educators’ association shall be permitted. Promotional


materials may include, but are not limited to, promotional


brochures, competitor comparison brochures, informational pamphlets,


membership applications, gift items, and association member gifts.


F. School districts shall not require a fee or other payment


from statewide professional educators’ associations for access,


promotional material review, promotional material distribution, or


other related activities.





Req. No. 408 Page 3


G. 1. A statewide professional educators’ association that is


not allowed access as provided for in this section shall notify the


board of education of the school district where access was denied.


2. Upon notification, if the school district board of education


does not ensure equal access is provided to the statewide


professional educators’ association within fifteen (15) days, the


association shall notify the State Board of Education.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-408 EB 1/19/2025 5:44:37 AM





















Req. No. 408 Page 4